Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1305
Petition papers; filing; signature verification; procedure.

(1) The principal circulator or circulators shall file, as one instrument, all petition papers comprising a recall petition for signature verification with the filing officer within thirty days after the filing officer issues the initial petition papers to the principal circulator or circulators as provided in section 32-1303.

(2) If the filing officer is the subject of a recall petition, the signature verification process shall be conducted by two election commissioners or county clerks appointed by the Secretary of State which shall not include the filing officer. Mileage and expenses incurred by officials appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be reimbursed by the political subdivision involved in the recall.

(3) Within fifteen business days after the filing of the petition, the filing officer shall ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of registered voters. No new signatures may be added after the initial filing of the petition papers. Any person may remove his or her name from a petition as provided in section 32-632. If the petition is found to be sufficient, the filing officer shall attach to the petition a certificate showing the result of such examination. If the requisite number of signatures has not been gathered, the filing officer shall file the petition in his or her office without prejudice to the filing of a new petition for the same purpose.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 378;

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 16;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 56.